California statutes. Penal Code
(e) The commitment of local governmental entities to join with law enforcement and the citizens to fight the drug problem. At a minimum, this commitment shall be demonstrated by the school districts, parks and recreation departments, public social services, and code enforcement agencies.

(f) The approval of the program by either the city council or the county board of supervisors.

(g) Demonstrated effort on the part of the applicant to show how funds that may be awarded under this program may be coordinated or consolidated with other local, state, or federal funds available for the activities set forth in Section 13844.

(h) Applicant shall be a city or county law enforcement agency, or portion, or combination thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1419, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

13846.

(a) Evaluation and monitoring of all grants made under this section shall be the responsibility of the office. The office shall issue standard reporting forms for reporting the level of activities and number of crimes reported in participating communities.

(b) Information on successful programs shall be made available and relayed to other California communities through the technical assistance procedures of the office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 453.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. Rural Indian Crime Prevention Program [13847. - 13847.2.]

13847.

(a) There is hereby established in the Office of Emergency Services a program of financial and technical assistance for local law enforcement, called the Rural Indian Crime Prevention Program. The program shall target the relationship between law enforcement and Native American communities to encourage and to strengthen cooperative efforts and to implement crime suppression and prevention programs.

(b) The Director of Emergency Services may allocate and award funds to those local units of government, or combinations thereof, in which a special program is established in law enforcement agencies that meets the criteria set forth in Sections 13847.1 and 13847.2.

(c) The allocation and award of funds shall be made upon application executed by the chief law enforcement officer of the applicant unit of government and approved by the legislative body. Funds disbursed under this chapter shall not supplant local funds that would, in the absence of the Rural Indian Crime Prevention Program, be made available to support the suppression and prevention of crime on reservations and rancherias.

(d) The Director of Emergency Services shall prepare and issue administrative guidelines and procedures for the Rural Indian Crime Prevention Program consistent with this chapter.

(e) The guidelines shall set forth the terms and conditions upon which the Office of Emergency Services is prepared to offer
 grants of funds pursuant to statutory authority. The guidelines do not constitute rules, regulations, orders, or standards of general application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 454.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

13847.1.

Law enforcement agencies receiving funds under this chapter shall meet the following criteria:

(a) Training of law enforcement personnel to be culturally sensitive in the delivery of services to the Native American communities. This training shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The creation of an Indian community officer position.

(2) The recruiting and training of Native American volunteers to assist in implementing and conducting reservation or rancheria crime prevention programs.

(b) Increasing community crime awareness by establishing community involvement programs, such as community or neighborhood watch programs, tailored for reservations and rancherias.

(c) Establishing drug traffic intervention programs on reservations through the increased use of law enforcement and special assignment officers.

(d) Developing a delinquency prevention or diversion program for Indian teenagers and young adults.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 132, Sec. 1.   Effective June 11, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

13847.2.

(a) The Rural Indian and Law Enforcement Local Advisory Committee shall be composed of a chief executive of a law enforcement agency, two tribal council members, two tribal elders, one Indian law enforcement officer, one Indian community officer, one representative of the Bureau of Indian Affairs, and any additional members that may prove to be crucial to the committee. All members of the advisory committee shall be designated by the Director of Emergency Services, who shall provide staff services to the advisory committee.

(b) The Director of Emergency Services, in consultation with the advisory committee, shall develop specific guidelines, and administrative procedures, for the
 selection of projects to be funded by the Rural Indian Crime Prevention Program which guidelines shall include the selection criteria described in this chapter.

(c) Administration of the overall program and the evaluation and monitoring of all grants made under this chapter shall be performed by the Office of Emergency Services, provided that funds expended for these functions shall not exceed 5 percent of the total annual amount made available for the purpose of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 455.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.7. High Technology Theft Apprehension and Prosecution Program [13848. - 13848.4.]

13848.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to provide local law enforcement and district attorneys with the tools necessary to successfully interdict the promulgation of high technology crime. According to the federal Law Enforcement Training Center, it is expected that states will see a tremendous growth in high technology crimes over the next few years as computers become more available and computer users more skilled in utilizing technology to commit these faceless crimes. High technology crimes are those crimes in which technology is used as an instrument in committing, or assisting in the commission of, a crime, or which is the target of a criminal act.

(b) Funds provided under this program are intended to ensure that law enforcement is equipped with the necessary personnel and equipment to successfully combat high technology crime which includes, but is not limited to, the following offenses:

(1) White-collar crime, such as check, automated teller machine, and credit card fraud, committed by means of electronic or computer-related media.

(2) Unlawful access, destruction of or unauthorized entry into and use of private, corporate, or government computers and networks, including wireless and wireline communications networks and law enforcement dispatch systems, and the theft, interception, manipulation, destruction, or unauthorized disclosure of data stored within those computers and networks.

(3) Money laundering accomplished with the aid of computer networks or electronic banking transfers.

(4) Theft and resale of telephone calling codes, theft of telecommunications service, theft of wireless communication service, and theft of cable television services by manipulation of the equipment used to receive those services.

(5) Software piracy and other unlawful duplication of information.

(6) Theft and resale of computer components and other high technology products produced by the high technology industry.

(7) Remarking and counterfeiting of computer hardware and software.

(8) Theft of trade secrets.

(c) This program is also intended to provide support to law enforcement agencies by providing technical assistance to those agencies with respect to the seizure and analysis of computer systems used to commit high technology crimes or store evidence relating to those crimes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 555, Sec. 2.   Effective September 18, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

13848.2.

There is hereby established a program of financial and technical assistance for law enforcement and district attorneys’ offices, designated the High Technology Theft Apprehension and Prosecution Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 75.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

13848.4.

(a) Moneys allocated for the High Technology Theft Apprehension and Prosecution Program pursuant to Section 13821 shall be expended to fund programs to enhance the capacity of local law enforcement and prosecutors to deter, investigate, and prosecute high technology related crimes. Funds shall be expended to fund programs to enhance the capacity of local law enforcement, state police, and local prosecutors to deter, investigate, and prosecute high technology related crimes. Any funds distributed under this chapter shall be expended for the exclusive purpose of deterring, investigating, and prosecuting high technology related crimes.

(b) The funds allocated to the Department of Justice pursuant to paragraph
 (8) of subdivision (c) of Section 13821 shall be used for developing and maintaining a statewide database on high technology crime for use in developing and distributing intelligence information to participating law enforcement agencies and for the purposes of establishing statewide programs of education, training, and research for public prosecutors, investigators, and law enforcement officers relating to deterring, investigating, and prosecuting high technology related crimes.

(c) Any regional task force receiving funds under this section may elect to have
 the Department of Justice administer the regional task force program. The department may be reimbursed for any expenditures incurred for administering a regional task force from funds given to local law enforcement pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) No contract shall be entered into with the California District Attorneys Association for the purposes of financial and technical assistance pursuant to the High Technology Theft Apprehension and Prosecution Program authorized by Section 13848.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 83, Sec. 4.   (SB 157)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.8. Human Trafficking Prevention Vertical Prosecution Program [13849. - 13849.]

13849.

(a) There is hereby established in the Office of Emergency Services a program of financial and technical assistance for county district attorney offices for the prosecution of human trafficking crimes.

(b) The Director of Emergency Services shall, to the extent funds are available for this purpose, allocate and award funds to up to 11 district attorney offices that apply for funding pursuant to this chapter. Each county selected for funding shall meet all of the following minimum requirements:

(1) Employ a vertical prosecution methodology for human trafficking crimes.

(2) Dedicate at least one-half of the time of one
 deputy district attorney and one-half of the time of one district attorney investigator solely to the investigation and prosecution of human trafficking crimes.

(3) Provide the office with annual data on the number of human trafficking cases filed by that county, the number of human trafficking convictions obtained, and the sentences imposed for those convicted of human trafficking in that county.

(4) Enter into an agreement, either by contract or a memorandum of understanding, with an advocacy agency funded by the office that provides services, counseling, or both, to victims of human trafficking in order to ensure that victims and witnesses of human trafficking, as appropriate, receive services.

(5) Funding received by district attorney offices pursuant to this program shall be used to supplement, and not supplant,
 existing financial resources.

(c) The office shall select applications based upon a competitive process and may establish selection criteria. At a minimum, an applicant shall demonstrate the ability to comply with the criteria in subdivision (b) and include an estimate of the number of potential human trafficking crimes in that county.

(d) (1) On or before January 1, 2028, the office shall submit to the Legislature and the Governor’s office a report that describes the counties that received funding pursuant to this program, the number of prosecutions for human trafficking cases filed by the counties receiving funding, the number of human trafficking convictions obtained by those counties, and the sentences imposed for human trafficking crimes in those counties.

(2) The report required pursuant
 to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) As used in this section, “human trafficking crimes” means any violation of Section 236.1 or subdivision (l) of Section 647.

(f) Not more than 10 percent of funds appropriated for this program shall be retained by the office for administrative costs, including technical assistance, training, and the cost of producing the report required pursuant to subdivision (d).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 82, Sec. 7.   (AB 379)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. California Career Criminal Apprehension Program [13850. - 13854.]

13850.

The Legislature hereby finds that a substantial and disproportionate amount of serious crime is committed against the people of California by a relatively small number of multiple and repeat felony offenders, commonly known as career criminals. In enacting this chapter, the Legislature intends to support increased efforts by local law enforcement agencies to investigate and apprehend career criminals through management, organization and operational techniques that have been demonstrated to be effective in selected cities and counties in this and other states, and through advanced state-of-the-art techniques that focus law enforcement efforts and resources on identifying persons subject to career criminal apprehension efforts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 477, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13851.

(a) There is hereby established in the Office of Emergency Services a program of financial, training, and technical assistance for local law enforcement, called the California Career Criminal Apprehension Program. All funds made available to the Office of Emergency Services for the purposes of this chapter shall be administered and disbursed by the Director of Emergency Services.

(b) The Director of Emergency Services is authorized to allocate and award funds to those local units of government or combinations thereof, in which a special program is established in law enforcement agencies that meets the criteria set forth in Sections 13852 and 13853.

(c) The allocation and award of funds shall be made upon application executed by the chief law enforcement officer of the applicant unit of government and approved by the legislative body. Funds disbursed under this chapter shall not supplant local funds that would, in the absence of the California Career Criminal Apprehension Program, be made available to support the apprehension of multiple or repeat felony criminal offenders.

(d) The Director of Emergency Services shall prepare and issue administrative guidelines and procedures for the California Career Criminal Apprehension Program consistent with this chapter.

(e) These guidelines shall set forth the terms and conditions upon which the Office of Emergency Services is
 prepared to offer grants of funds pursuant to statutory authority. The guidelines do not constitute rules, regulations, orders, or standards of general application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 456.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

13852.

Law enforcement agencies receiving funds under this chapter shall employ enhanced law enforcement management efforts and resources. Enhanced law enforcement efforts and resources shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) Crime analysis, which is the timely collection and study of local crime data to perform all of the following:

(1) Identify evolving or existing crime patterns, particularly those involving career felony criminals.

(2) Provide investigative leads.

(3) Identify geographical areas or population groups experiencing relatively severe crime victimization, in order to improve effectiveness of crime prevention efforts.

(4) Provide supporting data for improved allocation of overall law enforcement agency resources.

(b) Improved management of patrol and investigative operations involving use of information resulting from crime analysis, which may include participation in multijurisdictional investigative units and measures to increase continuity of investigative efforts from the initial patrol response through the arrest and prosecution of the offender. Such measures may include:

(1) Innovative personnel deployment techniques.

(2) Innovative techniques of case screening.

(3) Management of continuing investigations.

(4) Monitoring of investigation operations.

(c) (1) Each career criminal apprehension program, supported under this chapter, shall concentrate on the identification and arrest of career criminals and the support of their subsequent prosecution. The determination of which suspected felony offenders shall be the subject of career criminal apprehension efforts shall be in accordance with written criteria developed by the applicant law enforcement agency, consistent with Section 13853 and approved by the head district attorney. Highly qualified and experienced personnel shall be assigned to staff career criminal apprehension programs.

(2) Each career criminal apprehension program as one of its ongoing functions, shall maintain coordination with the prosecutor assigned to each case resulting from its efforts. This coordination should include, but not be limited to, case preparation, processing, and adjudication.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 477, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13853.

An individual who is under investigation for the commission or attempted commission of one or more of the felonies listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 999e and who is determined to have committed three or more separate felony offenses not arising out of the same transaction, or has been convicted during the preceding 10 years for the commission or attempted commission of any felony listed in subdivision (a), or at least two convictions during the preceding 10 years for the commission or attempted commission of any felony listed in subdivision (b) may be the subject of career criminal apprehension efforts.

(a) Robbery of the first degree, carjacking, burglary of the first degree, arson as defined in Section 451 or 452, forcible rape, sodomy or oral copulation committed with force, lewd or lascivious conduct committed upon a child, kidnapping as defined in Section 209 or 209.5, murder, or manslaughter.

(b) Grand theft, grand theft auto, receiving stolen property, robbery of the second degree, burglary of the second degree, kidnapping as defined in Section 207, assault with a deadly weapon or instrument, or any unlawful act relating to controlled substances in violation of Section 11351 or 11352 of the Health and Safety Code.

For purposes of this chapter, the 10-year periods specified in this section shall be exclusive of any time which the arrested person has served in state prison.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 646, Sec. 2.   Effective September 19, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13854.

(a) The Director of Emergency Services shall develop specific guidelines, and administrative procedures, for the selection of the California Career Criminal Apprehension Program.

(b) Administration of the overall program and the evaluation and monitoring of all grants made under this chapter shall be performed by the Office of Emergency Services, provided that funds expended for those functions shall not exceed 7.5 percent of the total annual amount made available for the purpose of this chapter.

(c) Local assistance grants made pursuant to this chapter shall not be subject to review pursuant to Section 10290 of the Public Contract
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 457.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Suppression of Drug Abuse in Schools [13860. - 13864.]

13860.

The Legislature finds and declares that a substantial drug abuse and drug trafficking problem exists among school-age children on and around school campuses in the State of California. By enacting this chapter, it is the intention of the Legislature to support increased efforts by local law enforcement agencies, working in conjunction with school districts and county drug offices to suppress trafficking and prevent drug abuse among school age children on and around school campuses through the development of innovative and model programs by local law enforcement agencies and schools and drug abuse agencies. As used in this chapter, drugs are defined as marijuana, inhalants, narcotics, dangerous drugs, pharmaceuticals, glue and alcohol. It is the further intention of the Legislature to establish a program of financial and technical assistance for local law enforcement and school districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 952, Sec. 1.   Effective September 20, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

13861.

There is hereby created in the Office of Emergency Services the Suppression of Drug Abuse in Schools Program. All funds made available to the Office of Emergency Services for the purposes of this chapter shall be administered and disbursed by the Director of Emergency Services in consultation with the State Suppression of Drug Abuse in Schools Advisory Committee established pursuant to Section 13863.

(a) The Director of Emergency Services, in consultation with the State Suppression of Drug Abuse in Schools Advisory Committee, is authorized to allocate and award funds to local law enforcement agencies and public schools jointly working to develop drug abuse prevention and drug trafficking suppression
 programs in substantial compliance with the policies and criteria set forth in Sections 13862 and 13863.

(b) The allocation and award of funds shall be made upon the joint application by the chief law enforcement officer of the coapplicant law enforcement agency and approved by the law enforcement agency’s legislative body and the superintendent and board of the school district coapplicant. The joint application of the law enforcement agency and the school district shall be submitted for review to the Local Suppression of Drug Abuse in Schools Advisory Committee established pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 13862. After review, the application shall be submitted to the Office of Emergency Services. Funds disbursed under this chapter may enhance but shall not supplant local funds that would, in the absence of the
 Suppression of Drug Abuse in Schools Program, be made available to suppress and prevent drug abuse among schoolage children and to curtail drug trafficking in and around school areas.

(c) The coapplicant local law enforcement agency and the coapplicant school district may enter into interagency agreements between themselves which will allow the management and fiscal tasks created pursuant to this chapter and assigned to both the law enforcement agency and the school district to be performed by only one of them.

(d) Within 90 days of the effective date of this chapter, the Director of Emergency Services, in consultation with the State Suppression of Drug Abuse in Schools Advisory Committee established pursuant to Section 13863, shall prepare and issue administrative
 guidelines and procedures for the Suppression of Drug Abuse in Schools Program consistent with this chapter. In addition to all other formal requirements that may apply to the enactment of these guidelines and procedures, a complete and final draft shall be submitted within 60 days of the effective date of this chapter to the Chairpersons of the Committee on Criminal Law and Public Safety of the Assembly and the Judiciary Committee of the Senate of the California Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 458.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

13862.

Law enforcement agencies and school districts receiving funds under this chapter shall concentrate enhanced apprehension, prevention, and education efforts and resources on drug abuse and drug trafficking in and around school campuses.

(a) These enhanced apprehension, prevention, and education efforts shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Drug traffic intervention programs.

(2) School and classroom-oriented programs, using tested drug abuse education curriculum that provides indepth and accurate information on drugs, which may include the participation of local law enforcement agencies and qualified drug abuse prevention specialists and which are designed to increase teachers’ and students’ awareness of drugs and their effects.

(3) Family oriented programs aimed at preventing drug abuse which may include the participation of community-based organizations experienced in the successful operation of such programs.

(4) The establishment of a Local Suppression of Drug Abuse in Schools Advisory Committee. The committee shall be established and appointed by the board of supervisors of each county and city and county. However, if the agency receiving funds under this chapter is a city agency and the program does not involve any county agency, or if a county agency is involved and the county board of supervisors consents, the committee shall be established and appointed by the city council. The committee may be a newly created committee or an existing local drug abuse committee as designated by the board or city council. The committee shall be composed of, at a minimum, the following:

(A) Local law enforcement executives.

(B) School district executives.

(C) Schoolsite staff, which includes administrators, teachers, or other credentialed personnel.

(D) Parents.

(E) Students.

(F) School peace officers.

(G) County drug program administrators designated pursuant to Section 11962 of the Health and Safety Code.

(H) Drug prevention program executives.

(5) Development and distribution of appropriate written and audio-visual aids for training of school and law enforcement staff for handling drug-related problems and offenses. Appropriate existing aids may be utilized in lieu of development of new materials.

(6) Development of prevention and intervention programs for elementary school teachers and students, including utilization of existing prevention and intervention programs.

(7) Development of a coordinated intervention system that identifies students with chronic drug abuse problems and facilitates their referral to a drug abuse treatment program.

(b) Enhanced apprehension, prevention, and education efforts commenced under this section shall be a joint effort between local law enforcement and local school districts in cooperation with county drug program offices. These efforts shall include, but not be limited to, the concentration of apprehension efforts in “problem” areas identified by local school authorities.

(c) Funds appropriated pursuant to this chapter may be used in part to support state-level development and statewide distribution of appropriate written and audio-visual aids for public awareness and training of school and law enforcement staff for handling drug-related problems and offenses. When existing aids can be identified, these aids may be utilized in lieu of the development of new aids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 935, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

13864.

There is hereby created in the Office of Emergency Services the Comprehensive Alcohol and Drug Prevention Education component of the Suppression of Drug Abuse in Schools Program in public elementary schools in grades 4 to 6, inclusive. Notwithstanding Section 13861 or any other provision in this code, all Comprehensive Alcohol and Drug Prevention Education component funds made available to the Office of Emergency Services in accordance with the Classroom Instructional Improvement and Accountability Act shall be administered by and disbursed to county superintendents of schools in this state by the Director of Emergency Services. All applications for that funding shall be reviewed and evaluated by the Office of Emergency Services, in consultation with the
 State Department of Health Care Services and the State Department of Education.

(a) The Director of Emergency Services is authorized to allocate and award funds to county department superintendents of schools for allocation to individual school districts or to a consortium of two or more school districts. Applications funded under this section shall comply with the criteria, policies, and procedures established under subdivision (b) of this section.

(b) As a condition of eligibility for the funding described in this section, the school district or consortium of school districts shall have entered into an agreement with a local law enforcement agency to jointly implement a comprehensive alcohol and drug abuse prevention, intervention, and suppression program developed by the
 Office of Emergency Services, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services and the State Department of Education, containing all of the following components:

(1) A standardized age-appropriate curriculum designed for pupils in grades 4 to 6, inclusive, specifically tailored and sensitive to the socioeconomic and ethnic characteristics of the target pupil population. Although new curricula shall not be required to be developed, existing curricula may be modified and adapted to meet local needs. The elements of the standardized comprehensive alcohol and drug prevention education program curriculum shall be defined and approved by the Governor’s Policy Council on Drug and Alcohol Abuse, as established by Executive Order No. D-70-80.

(2) A planning process that
 includes assessment of the school district’s characteristics, resources, and the extent of problems related to juvenile drug abuse, and input from local law enforcement agencies.

(3) A school district governing board policy that provides for a coordinated intervention system that, at a minimum, includes procedures for identification, intervention, and referral of at-promise alcohol- and drug-involved youth, and identifies the roles and responsibilities of law enforcement, school personnel, parents, and pupils.

(4) Early intervention activities that include, but are not limited to, the identification of pupils who are high risk or have chronic drug abuse problems, assessment, and referral for appropriate services, including ongoing support services.

(5) Parent education programs to initiate and maintain parental involvement, with an emphasis for parents of at-risk pupils.

(6) Staff and in-service training programs, including both indepth training for the core team involved in providing program services and general awareness training for all school faculty and administrative, credentialed, and noncredentialed school personnel.

(7) In-service training programs for local law enforcement officers.

(8) School, law enforcement, and community involvement to ensure coordination of program services. Pursuant to that coordination, the school district or districts and other local agencies are encouraged to use a
 single community advisory committee or task force for drug, alcohol, and tobacco abuse prevention programs, as an alternative to the creation of a separate group for that purpose under each state or federally funded program.

(c) The application of the county superintendent of schools shall be submitted to the Office of Emergency Services. Funds made available to the Office of Emergency Services for allocation under this section are intended to enhance, but shall not supplant, local funds that would, in the absence of the Comprehensive Alcohol and Drug Prevention Education component, be made available to prevent, intervene in, or suppress drug abuse among schoolage children. For districts that are already implementing a comprehensive drug abuse prevention program for pupils in grades 4 to 6, inclusive, the county superintendent shall propose
 the use of the funds for drug prevention activities in school grades other than 4 to 6, inclusive, compatible with the program components of this section. The expenditure of funds for that alternative purpose shall be approved by the Director of Emergency Services.

(1) Unless otherwise authorized by the Office of Emergency Services, each county superintendent of schools shall be the fiscal agent for any Comprehensive Alcohol and Drug Prevention Education component award, and shall be responsible for ensuring that each school district within that county receives the allocation prescribed by the Office of Emergency Services. Each county superintendent shall develop a countywide plan that complies with program guidelines and procedures established by the Office of Emergency Services pursuant to subdivision (d). A maximum of 5 percent of
 the county’s allocation may be used for administrative costs associated with the project.

(2) Each county superintendent of schools shall establish and chair a local coordinating committee to assist the superintendent in developing and implementing a countywide implementation plan. This committee shall include the county drug administrator, law enforcement executives, school district governing board members and administrators, school faculty, parents, and drug prevention and intervention program executives selected by the superintendent and approved by the county board of supervisors.

(d) The Director of Emergency Services, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services and the State Department of Education, shall prepare and issue guidelines and procedures
 for the Comprehensive Alcohol and Drug Prevention Education component consistent with this section.

(e) The Comprehensive Alcohol and Drug Prevention Education component guidelines shall set forth the terms and conditions upon which the Office of Emergency Services is prepared to award grants of funds pursuant to this section. The guidelines shall not constitute rules, regulations, orders, or standards of general application.

(f) Funds awarded under the Comprehensive Alcohol and Drug Prevention Education Program shall not be subject to Section 10318 of the Public Contract Code.

(g) Funds available pursuant to Item 8100-111-001 and Provision 1 of Item 8100-001-001 of the Budget Act of 1989, or the successor provision
 of the appropriate Budget Act, shall be allocated to implement this section.

(h) The Director of Emergency Services shall collaborate, to the extent possible, with other state agencies that administer drug, alcohol, and tobacco abuse prevention education programs to streamline and simplify the process whereby local educational agencies apply for drug, alcohol, and tobacco education funding under this section and under other state and federal programs. The Office of Emergency Services, the State Department of Health Care Services, the State Department of Education, and other state agencies, to the extent possible, shall develop joint policies and collaborate planning in the administration of drug, alcohol, and tobacco abuse prevention education programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 800, Sec. 23.   (AB 413)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Information on Racial, Ethnic and Religious Crimes [13872. - 13872.]

13872.

The crimes that shall be the focus of this chapter shall include a wide variety of incidents, which reflect obvious racial, ethnic, or religious motivations, ranging from vandalizing a place of worship to assaults between members of gangs, including, but not limited to, incidents that occur on school grounds and between gang members and any other incidents that law enforcement officers on a case-by-case basis identify as having a racial, ethnic or religious motivation. They shall not include incidents of discrimination in employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1482, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.6. Law Enforcement Response to Drug Endangered Children [13879.80. - 13879.81.]

13879.80.

(a) Every law enforcement and social services agency in this state is encouraged to develop, adopt, and implement written policies and standards for their response to narcotics crime scenes where a child is either immediately present or where there is evidence that a child lives, by January 1, 2005. These policies shall reflect the fact that exposing a child to the manufacturing, trafficking, and use of narcotics is criminal conduct and that a response coordinated by law enforcement and social services agencies is essential to the child’s health and welfare.

(b) The needs of a drug endangered child are best served with written policies encouraging the arrest of an individual for child endangerment where there is probable cause that an offense has been committed coordinated with an appropriate investigation of the child’s welfare by child protective agencies. Protocols that encourage a dependency investigation contemporaneous with a law enforcement investigation at a narcotics crime scene, when appropriate, are consistent with a child’s best interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 75, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

13879.81.

Communities are encouraged to form multijurisdictional groups that include law enforcement officers, prosecutors, public health professionals, and social workers to address the welfare of children endangered by parental drug use. These coordinated groups should develop standards and protocols, evidenced by memorandums of understanding, that address the following:

(a) Felony and misdemeanor arrests.

(b) Immediate response of protective social workers to a narcotics crime scene involving a child.

(c) Outsourcing protective social workers to law enforcement.

(d) Dependency investigations.

(e) Forensic drug testing and interviewing.

(f) Decontamination of a child found in a lab setting.

(g) Medical examinations and developmental evaluations.

(h) Creation of two hours of P.O.S.T. drug endangered children awareness training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 405, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. California Major Narcotic Vendors Prosecution Law [13880. - 13884.]

13880.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the production and sale of narcotics is an ever increasing problem because of the substantial illicit profits derived therefrom. The Legislature further finds and declares that a substantial and disproportionate amount of serious crime is associated with the cultivation, processing, manufacturing, and sale of narcotics.
